Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.20.520

Behavioral health and suicide prevention—Data.

(1) By December 31, 2018, for the purposes of collecting data on suicide prevention and behavioral health in higher education, the entity within the University of Washington school of social work specified under RCW 28B.20.510 shall identify data, methods for data collection, and data definitions to be used by postsecondary institutions required to submit annual reports under *RCW 28B.20.515. The entity shall collaborate with the postsecondary institutions, as defined in RCW 28B.77.120, in establishing data collection requirements and criteria.

(2) The entity shall aggregate the information it receives by sector and, by December 1st of each year, the entity must submit an aggregated summary report to the relevant committees of the legislature. The entity shall serve as the depository for annual reports submitted by institutions of higher education under *RCW 28B.20.515.

[ 2018 c 293 s 5.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 28B.20.515 expired December 31, 2022.

Intent—Findings—2018 c 293: See note following RCW 28B.20.510.